lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_VV_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:siidogena' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:siidogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj:siidogenag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:siigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:siiwa' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:siiwan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj:siiwag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:siibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:siibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:siibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj:siibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj:siibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:dogena' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:dogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj:dogenag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:gwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:wa' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:wan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj:wag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:banen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:banii' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj:baneg EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj:baniig EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_VV                                     !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_VV_Flags_Prefix=NI
@U.Order.Ind@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_VV_Prefix=NI_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_VV, Prefix: NI, Order: Ind             !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_VV_Prefix=NI_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj:siiminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj:siimin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj:siiminaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj:minaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj:min EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj:minaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V                                      !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary
0:%>%> VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj            !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Stems
aayaanikoobiwag:aayaanikoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ayaaniginiwag:ayaanigini VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ayaanzigweshimowag:ayaanzigweshimo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
baabaatayiinowag:baabaatayiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
baataniinowag:baataniino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
baatayiinowag:baatayiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
babiiwaakoziwag:babiiwaakozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
babiiwiminagiziwag:babiiwiminagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
babiiwizhenyiwag:babiiwizhenyi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
babiiwizhiinyiwag:babiiwizhiinyi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
bagamiinowag:bagamiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
bangiishenhwagiziwag:bangiishenhwagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
bimiinowag:bimiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dadaakooziwag:dadaakoozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dadakajiwag:dadakaji VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
danaamiwag:danaami VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dashiwag:dashi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dasoobiwag:dasoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dasoobizowag:dasoobizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dasoogaabawiwag:dasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dasoonagiziwag:dasoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dasoopizowag:dasoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
daswegiziwag:daswegizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
daswewaanagiziwag:daswewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
gaagiizizowag:gaagiizizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
gagaanominagiziwag:gagaanominagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
gagaanooziwag:gagaanoozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
gagaanwaakoziwag:gagaanwaakozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
giiwitaabiwag:giiwitaabi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
giiwitaagaabawiwag:giiwitaagaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ingodwaachiwag:ingodwaachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ingodwaasoogaabawiwag:ingodwaasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ishwaachiwag:ishwaachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ishwaasoogaabawiwag:ishkwaasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
izhiinowag:izhiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
jiibwaabiigamowag:jiibwaabiigamo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
maamawigaabawiwag:maamawigaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
maamawoobiwag:maamawoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
maawandoobiwag:maawandoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mamaandidowag:mamaandido VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mamaangadeziwag:mamaangadezi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mamiskwaakoziwag:mamiskwaakozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mangigaabawiwag:mangigaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
midaachiwag:midaachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
midaasoobiwag:midaasoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
midaasoogaabawiwag:midaasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
midaasoopizowag:midaasoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mooshkinebiwag:mooshkinebi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mooshkinegaabawiwag:mooshkinegaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanaananiwag:naanaanani VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naananiwag:naanani VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naaniibidebiwag:naaniibidebi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanoobiwag:naanoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanoogaabawiwag:naanoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanoonagiziwag:naanoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanoopizowag:naanoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanwewaanagiziwag:naanwewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
neniizhiwag:neniizhi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibide'oozowag:niibide'oozo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibidebiwag:niibidebi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibidegaabawiwag:niibidegaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibidekizowag:niibidekizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibideyaabanigoziwag:niibideyaabanigozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibowagiziwag:niibowagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiwewaanagiziwag:niiwewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiwiwag:niiwi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiwoogaabawiwag:niiwogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiyoobiwag:niiyoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiyoogaabawiwag:niiyoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiyoonagiziwag:niiyoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiyoopizowag:niiyoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhiwag:niizhi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoobiwag:niizhoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoobizowag:niizhoobizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoogaabawiwag:niizhoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoonagiziwag:niizhoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoopizowag:niizhoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhooshimowag:niizhooshimo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwaachiwag:niizhwaachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwaasoobiwag:niizhwaasoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwaasoogaabawiwag:niizhwaasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwaasoopizowag:niizhwaasoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwewaanagiziwag:niizhwewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ningodwaachiwag:ningodwaachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ningodwaasoobiwag:ningodwaasoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ningodwaasoogaabawiwag:ningodwaasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ningodwaasoopizowag:ningodwaasoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nishwaachiwag:nishwaachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nishwaasoobiwag:nishwaasoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nishwaasoogaabawiwag:nishwaasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nishwaasoopizowag:nishwaasoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisiwag:nisi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisoobiwag:nisoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisoobizowag:nisoobizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisoogaabawiwag:nisoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisoonagiziwag:nisoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisoopizowag:nisoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niswewaanagiziwag:niswewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okobizowag:okobizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okogaabawiwag:okogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okogiwag:okogi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okwabiwag:okwabi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okwagomowag:okwagomo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okwakizowag:okwakizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okwiinowag:okwiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
waakaabiwag:waakaabi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
waawiyekizowag:waawiyekizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
zhaangachiwag:zhaangachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
zhaangasoogaabawiwag:zhaangasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
zhaangasoopizowag:zhaangasoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
